Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 3. Public Printing Contracts

Cross references. —

As to public works and contracts generally, see art. 1 of this chapter.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.

§ 16-6-301.
Preference for resident bidders; exception; “resident” defined; violation.

Whenever a contract is let by the state or any department thereof, or any of its subdivisions, for public printing, including reports of officers and boards, pamphlets, blanks, letterheads, envelopes and printed and lithographed matter of every kind and description whatsoever, the contract shall be let to the responsible resident making the lowest bid if the resident’s bid is not more than ten percent (10%) higher than that of the lowest responsible nonresident bidder. Any successful resident bidder shall perform at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the contract within the state of Wyoming. This section shall not apply to any contract for the compilation, codification, revision, or digest of the statutes or case law of the state.

As used in this section, “resident” means any person or business entity who has been a bona fide resident of this state as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(i), for one (1) year or more immediately prior to bidding upon a contract, and who has an established printing plant in actual operation in the state of Wyoming immediately prior to bidding upon a contract.

Any contract let or performed in violation of this section shall be null and void and no funds shall be paid for the performance thereof.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 119, §§ 1 to 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-342.1 to 9-342.3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-501 to 9-5-503; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “or business entity” for “partnership, corporation or association,” inserted “as defined in W.S. 16-1-101(a)(i)” and made a stylistic change in (b).

Only bidder to contract may have work done by out-of-state company. —

This section was not violated by a printing contractor which had all of its work done by an out-of-state company, since the contractor was the only bidder to the contract. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n v. Mills Co., 701 P.2d 819,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 495

(Wyo. 1985).